Maryland, session 2026, HB0755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE” MEANS ANY PORTABLE
ELECTRONIC DEVICE CARRIED OR TRANSPORTED BY A STUDENT TO RECEIVE, SEND,
OR RECORD VOICE, IMAGE, OR TEXT CONTENT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0755*

HOUSE BILL 755
(II) “PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE PROVIDED BY A COUNTY BOARD FOR INSTRUCTIONAL
PURPOSES OR A MEDICAL DEVICE PROVIDED BY A MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL FOR A
STUDENT’S HEALTH CARE NEEDS.
(3) “SCHOOL DAY HOURS” MEANS ALL THE HOURS OF THE SCHOOL
DAY FROM THE START OF THE DAY UNTIL THE END OF THE DAY.
(4) “STORE” MEANS TO SECURE IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE
COUNTY BOARD TO ENSURE THE PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE IS NOT CARRIED
ON THE STUDENT’S PERSON.
(B) NOT LATER THAN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY BOARD
SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY TO PROHIBIT THE USE OF PERSONAL
ELECTRONIC DEVICES BY STUDENTS DURING SCHOOL DAY HOURS.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE
POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING A PERSONAL ELECTRONIC
DEVICE DURING SCHOOL DAY HOURS; AND
(2) REQUIRE A STUDENT TO STORE THE STUDENT’S PERSONAL
ELECTRONIC DEVICE DURING SCHOOL DAY HOURS.
(D) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT PROHIBIT A
STUDENT FROM USING A PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE FOR ANY PURPOSE
DOCUMENTED IN THE STUDENT’S INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR 504
PLAN.
(E) EACH SCHOOL SHALL DESIGNATE ONE OR MORE TELEPHONES IN THE
SCHOOL TO BE USED BY STUDENTS TO CONTACT A STUDENT’S PARENT OR LEGAL
GUARDIAN OR OTHER RESPONSIBLE ADULT DURING SCHOOL DAY HOURS IF
NECESSARY.
(F) (1) A POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE
APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR VIOLATIONS OF THE POLICY.
(2) A DISCIPLINARY MEASURE ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT INCLUDE SUSPENSION OR EXPULSION SOLELY FOR A
VIOLATION OF THE POLICY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.

HOUSE BILL 755 3